chy.twol
Alphabet 

a e h k l ʼ m n o p s š t v x ė ȯ ȧ á é ó b c d f g i j k l q r u w y z

%{n%}:n %{n%}:0 !odd possessive prefix
%{v%}:v %{v%}:0 !odd possessive prefix
%{é%}:é 	!odd possessive prefix
%{ǒ%}:o %{ǒ%}:0 !obviatiative nouns 
%{ě%}:e %{ě%}:0 !possessive suffux
%{e%}:0 %{e%}:e !ke, pe, ʼe, etc. 
%{o%}:0 %{o%}:o %{o%}:e !for plural oʼo
%{s%}:0 %{s%}:s !tse
%{ʼ%}:0 %{ʼ%}:ʼ !for plural oʼo 
%{Ó%}:0 !for variation of IA obviatative. 
%{E%}:e %{E%}:é !for variation of IA obviatative. 
%{ē%}:e		!an e that NEVER changes
%{ō%}:o		!an o that NEVER changes


%{N%}:0

%>:0 

; 

Sets 

Vow = a e o ȧ ė ȯ á é ó %{E%};

Con = h k l ʼ m n p s š t v x ;

HighVow = á é ó ; !this refers to tone. 

VoicelessFric = h s š x ; !deleted if no following vowel

DeleteCon = h s š n ;

AddECon = k l ʼ m p v ; !t technicially in here. but ends in e

FinalMultichar = %{e%} %{o%} %{s%} %{ʼ%} ;

Eng = a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z ;

Chy = a e h k l ʼ m n o p s š t v x ė ȯ ȧ á é ó ;




Rules

"remove end consonant if no morpheme boundary"
[h:0 | s:0 | š:0 | n:0] <=> _ DeleteCon:* FinalMultichar:* .#. ; 
		except Vow: Vow: _ %{o%}: .#. ;
			_ Eng:* %{N%} ;

"accomplish t:tse <=> _ .#. t/%{s%}"
%{s%}:s <=> _ %{e%}: .#. ; 
except _ Eng:* %{N%} ; 

"Accomplish [ʼ:ʼe | m:me ] <=> _ .#. ;"
%{e%}:0 <=> _ %>: ; 

"Accomplish xaon -> xaoʼo/// n"
Cx:ʼ <=> Vow: Vow: _ %{o%}: .#. ;
	where Cx in (h s š n) ; 

"Accomplish xaon -> xaoʼo/// o"
%{o%}:Vx <=> Vow: Vy: DeleteCon: _ .#. ;
	where Vx in (e o)
		Vy in (e o)
	matched ;

"Accomplish xaon -> xaoʼo/// o but where o has an accent"
%{o%}:Vx <=> Vow: Vy: DeleteCon: _ .#. ;
	where Vx in (e o)
		Vy in (é ó)
	matched ;

"Accomplish xaon -> xaoʼo/// o but where o has an accent"
%{o%}:Vx <=> Vow: Vy: DeleteCon: _ .#. ;
	where Vx in (e o)
		Vy in (é ó)
	matched ;

!@ v:v é: h:h a:a n:n a:a m:m {e}:0

"Accomplish  nákȯhéo -> nákȯhéoʼo /// o"
%{o%}:o <=> Vow: %>: Vow: %{ʼ%}: _ ;
	%{ǒ%}: %>: Vow: %{ʼ%}: _ ;
"Accomplish  nákȯhéo -> nákȯhéoʼo /// ʼ"
%{ʼ%}:ʼ <=> Vow: %>: Vow: _ ;
	%{ǒ%}: %>: Vow: _ ;




"o and e become voiceless before t"
[a:ȧ | e:ė | o:ȯ ] <=> _ t: s:  ;
			_ t: %{s%}:  ; 
		except
			_ Eng:* %{N%} ;
			Vow: _ ;
			_ t: %{s%}: %{e%}: %>: [a: | o: | ȧ: | ȯ: | á: | ó: ] ; ! so no méʼėševȯto
			


"neutralization of é and ó at end of word"
[é:e | ó:o ] <=>  _ Con:* FinalMultichar:* .#. ;
			_ Vow: Con: FinalMultichar:* .#. ;!meeʼe
			_ (Con:) >: Vow: FinalMultichar:* ;!to prevent hexovóno ón>o{ʼ}{o}
			except Vow: _ FinalMultichar:* .#. ;
				Vow: _ Con: FinalMultichar:* .#. ;
"Neutralization for á"
[á:a] <=> _ Con: (Con:) FinalMultichar:* .#. ;
	_ FinalMultichar:* .#. ;


<<<<<<< HEAD
!"devoicing of neutral vowels before voiceless fricatives, but not in second to last syllable."
![a:ȧ | e:ė | o:ȯ ] <=> _ (%>:) VoicelessFric: ;
!			except 
!			_ Eng:* %{N%}: ;
!			Vow: _ ;
!			h: _ ; 
!			_ VoicelessFric: Con:* (%>:) Vow: Con:* FinalMultichar:* .#. ; 
!			_ VoicelessFric: %>: Vow: FinalMultichar:* .#. ; !hátseškeh>o{'}{o}
!			_ Con: FinalMultichar:* .#. ;
!			!Can't have three in a row. Middle stays as voiced.  
!			\h: Vow: VoicelessFric: VoicelessFric:* _ VoicelessFric: VoicelessFric:* (%>:) Vow: VoicelessFric:* ;
!"penultimate devoicing"
![a:ȧ | e:ė | o:ȯ ] <=> _ (>: ) [t: | s: | š: | k: | x:] Con:*(>:) [%{e%}: | e: | é: ] FinalMultichar:* .#. ;
!	except _ Eng:* %{N%}: ;


!"prepenultimate devoicing"
![a:ȧ | e:ė | o:ȯ ] <=> 




=======
"devoicing of neutral vowels before voiceless fricatives, but not in second to last syllable."
[a:ȧ | e:ė | o:ȯ ] <=> _ (%>:) VoicelessFric: ;
			except 
			_ Eng:* %{N%}: ;
			Vow: _ ;
			h: _ ; 
			_ VoicelessFric: Con:* (%>:) Vow: Con:* FinalMultichar:* .#. ; 
			_ VoicelessFric: %>: Vow: FinalMultichar:* .#. ; !hátseškeh>o{ʼ}{o}
			_ Con: FinalMultichar:* .#. ;
			!Canʼt have three in a row. Middle stays as voiced.  
			\h: Vow: VoicelessFric: VoicelessFric:* _ VoicelessFric: VoicelessFric:* (%>:) Vow: VoicelessFric:* ;
>>>>>>> 4f9cce7c13c8819775494f0cb6979624c9f5c0ad

"if the final high tone vowel is neutralized and there is a single high tone followed by a neutral tone, that neutral tone will become high."
[a:á | e:é | o:ó ] <=> HighVow _ Con: [Con: | Vow: ]* HighVow: Con:* FinalMultichar:* .#. ;
			except 
			_ t: .#. ; 

!RULES FOR COMBINING MORPHEMES. 
"e -> 0 morpheme boundary voiceless vowel."
[e:0 | o:0 ] <=> _ %>: [ė: | ȯ: | é: | ó: ]  ;


"voicesless becomes high tone if an e %> comes before it in morphology"
[ė:é | ȯ:ó] <=> [e: | o: ]%>: _ ; 

"> is bad"
>:0 <=> _ ;

"Possessive obviatative %{ǒ%}"
%{ǒ%}:0 <=> _ %>: ó: ;

!HANDLER FOR ENGLISH NAMES
"N is bad (used to distinguish English names from bible."
%{N%}:0 <=> _ ;

"%{H%} only happens after rlwyaeiou"
%{H%}:h <=> [a: | e: | i: | o: | u: | w: | y: | r: | l: ] %{N%}: %>: _ ;

!HANDLER FOR ODD POSSESSIVES.
"Odd possessives: é"
%{é%}:é <=> _ ;
"Odd possessives: n"
n:0 <=> _ e: %>: %{v%}: %{é%}: ;
"Odd possessives: prefix vowel"
[a:0 | e:0 ] <=> n: _ %>: %{v%}: %{é%}: ;
"Odd possessives: %{v%}:"
%{v%}:v <=> h: e: %>: _ ;


!VIA 
"vowel change in verb positive and negetive."
%{Ó%}:0 <=> _ ; 

"Vowel change in verb positive and negetive: Vowel"
[e:ó | a:á | é:ó] <=> _ >: %{Ó%}: ;
"High tone he before me in negetive forms"
%{E%}:é <=> _ >: m: e: ;


!VII

"Vowel with line over multichar never gets changed."
[%{ē%}:e | %{ō%}:o ]<=> _ ; 
